tools/spellcheckers/editdist.festschrift.regex
h (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? h ,,
i (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? i ,,
ï (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? ï ,,
j (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? j ,,
k (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? k ,,
l (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? l ,,
m (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? m ,,
n (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? n ,,
o (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? o ,,
p (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? p ,,
q (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? q ,,
r (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? r ,,
s (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? s ,,
t (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? t ,,
u (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? u ,,
v (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? v ,,
w (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? w ,,
x (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? x ,,
y (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? y ,,
z (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? z ,,
æ (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? æ ,,
ö (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? ö ,,
å (->) "<COR>"::10 || _ ? ? å
]
.o.
[ [? - "<COR>"]* "<COR>":0 "<COR>":0 "<COR>":"<CORR>" [? - "<COR>"]* ]
]
# Loan suffixes:
|
[
[
    [a l e]   (->) [ a a l e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [a l h]   (->) [ a a l h   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e t]     (->) [ e e t e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e t e m] (->) [ e e t e m "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v]     (->) [ i j v e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v e]   (->) [ i j v e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v t]   (->) [ i j v e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i v e r] (->) [ i j v h   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [u t t]   (->) [ u h t e   "<CORR>"]::30 
    || _ .#.
]
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]*  "<CORR>":0  [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
# Sámi suffixes:
|
[
[
    [i b i e] (->) [   e b e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i d i e] (->) [   e d e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e d e]   (->) [ i d i e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e g e]   (->) [ e h k e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i s n e] (->) [ i s n i e "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e s i]   (->) [ a s s e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [a s s i] (->) [ a s s e   "<CORR>"]::30 
    || _ .#.
]
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]*  "<CORR>":0  [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
# SMA vowel problems:
|
[
[
    [i j j i e]     (->) [æ j j a  "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [y j j e]       (->) [å j j a  "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i e]           (->) [ a       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [i e]           (->) [ ï e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [o a]           (->) [ å å     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [o e]           (->) [ a       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [o e]           (->) [ o       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ a ]           (->) [ o e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ o ]           (->) [ o e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ a ]           (->) [ å       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ o ]           (->) [ å       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ å ]           (->) [ o       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ u ]           (->) [ o       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ o ]           (->) [ u       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ a ]           (->) [ o       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ o ]           (->) [ a       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ e ]           (->) [ i       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ e ]           (->) [ æ       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ i ]           (->) [ e       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ u ]           (->) [ e e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ u ]           (->) [ ö ö     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [y ö|y ø]       (->) [ ö ö     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ö ö|ø ø]       (->) [ y ö     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [ö ö|ø ø]       (->) [ o e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [æ|ä]           (->) [ a e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [æ|ä]           (->) [ e a     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [æ|ä]           (->) [ a       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [å a]           (->) [ å e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [å e]           (->) [ å a     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [å a]           (->) [ å å     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [å å]           (->) [ å a     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e a]           (->) [ i e     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [e e]           (->) [ e       "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [å a]           (->) [ u a     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    [u a]           (->) [ å a     "<CORR>"]::30 
]
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]*  "<CORR>":0  [? - "<CORR>"]* ]
]
#context condition and "<CORR>" deletion
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]* ( "<CORR>":0 ) [? - "<CORR>"]* ];
